Alabama, session 2026rs, SB77.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
11 Section 1. Pursuant to the Alabama Sunset Law, the
12 Sunset Committee recommends the continuance of the 911 Board
13 until October 1, 2028, with additional recommendation for
14 statutory change as set out in Section 3.
15 Section 2. The existence and functioning of the 911
16 Board, created and functioning pursuant to Sections 11-98-1 to
17 11-98-16, inclusive, Code of Alabama 1975, is continued until
18 October 1 2028, and those code sections are expressly
19 preserved.
20 Section 3. Section 11-98-4.1, Code of Alabama 1975, is
21 amended to read as follows:
22 "§11-98-4.1
23 (a) There is created a statewide 911 Board. The board
24 shall be comprised of 13 members. All appointing authorities
25 shall coordinate their appointments to assure the board
26 membership is inclusive and reflects the racial, gender,
27 geographic, urban, rural, and economic diversity of the state.
28 The 911 Board shall be created effective July 1, 2012, and
Page 1

The 911 Board shall be created effective July 1, 2012, and
SB77 Enrolled
29 until the effective date of the statewide 911 charge pursuant
30 to Section 11-98-5, with cooperation of the CMRS Board, shall
31 plan for the implementation of the statewide 911 charge and
32 the distribution of the revenues as provided herein. The
33 reasonable administrative expenses incurred by the 911 Board
34 prior to the implementation of the statewide 911 charge may be
35 deducted from the existing CMRS Fund. Upon the effective date
36 of the new statewide 911 charge, the 911 Board shall replace
37 and supersede the CMRS Board formerly created pursuant to this
38 chapter, and the CMRS Fund shall be incorporated into, and
39 considered part of, the 911 Fund.
40 (b) The 13 members of the 911 Board, each of whom shall
41 serve for a term of four years, shall be appointed by the
42 Governor as follows:
43 (1) Seven members recommended by the Alabama
44 Association of 911 Districts, one from each of the seven
45 congressional districts, with each district representative
46 recommended selected by vote of the Alabama Association of 911
47 Districts members from that congressional district. The
48 initial appointments shall include the three district
49 representatives on the CMRS Board who shall serve through
50 March 31, 2014, and a member from the first, third, fifth, and
51 seventh congressional districts as provided herein. Following
52 the March 31, 2014, expiration of the terms of the district
53 representatives drawn from the CMRS Board, the Governor shall
54 appoint a member recommended by the Association of 911
55 Districts from each of the second, fourth, and sixth
56 congressional districts, it being the intent of this section
Page 2

congressional districts, it being the intent of this section
SB77 Enrolled
57 that each of the seven district representatives on the board
58 be from a different congressional district, as such districts
59 exist on May 8, 2012.
60 (2) Two members recommended by CMRS providers licensed
61 to do business in Alabama.
62 (3) Two members recommended by incumbent local exchange
63 carriers operating in Alabama, who shall not be from the same
64 local exchange carrier.
65 (4) Two members recommended by cable companies that
66 provide interconnected VoIP services in Alabama, who shall not
67 be from the same cable company.
68 (c) For purposes of the initial board appointments,
69 (1): (i) five members of the board shall be appointed for a
70 four-year term; (2) (ii) four members for a three-year term;
71 (3) (iii) the three members of the CMRS Board who are
72 appointed pursuant to subdivision (b)(1) to terms ending on
73 March 31, 2014; and (4) (iv) the remaining member for a
74 two-year term. Thereafter, board members shall serve staggered
75 terms of four years. In the event of a vacancy, the vacancy
76 shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the
77 same manner as the original appointment. Any vacancy occurring
78 on the 911 Board, whether for an expired or unexpired term,
79 shall be filled by appointment as soon as practicable after
80 the vacancy occurs, whether for an expired or unexpired term.
81 (d) For all terms expiring after June 1, 2014, the The
82 governmental entities or industry groups identified in
83 subsection (b) shall recommend at least two different
84 individuals for each board position for which they are charged
Page 3

individuals for each board position for which they are charged
SB77 Enrolled
85 with making a recommendation, with the Governor appointing a
86 member from among such the recommended candidates. For all
87 terms expiring after July 1, 2015, appointments made by the
88 Governor shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate as
89 provided in this subsection. Appointments made at times when
90 the Senate is not in session shall be effective immediately ad
91 interim and shall serve until the Senate acts on the
92 appointment as provided herein. Any appointment made while the
93 Senate is not in session shall be submitted to the Senate not
94 later than the third legislative day following the reconvening
95 of the Legislature. In the event the Senate fails or refuses
96 to act on the appointment, the individual whose name was
97 submitted shall continue to serve until action is taken on the
98 appointment by the Senate.
99 (e)(1) All appointees shall serve their appointed terms
100 unless the Senate elects to consider and then rejects their
101 appointment.
102 (2) The entire Senate or the Senate Committee on
103 Confirmations may elect to consider an appointment. The
104 rejection of an appointment by the Senate Committee on
105 Confirmations shall be considered a rejection by the entire
106 Senate.
107 (e)(f) The statewide 911 Board shall have the following
108 powers and duties:
109 (1) To develop and publish a 911 Annual Report. In
110 fulfilling this duty, the 911 Board shall monitor trends in
111 voice communications service technology and in enhanced 911
112 service technology, investigate, and incorporate Geographical
Page 4

service technology, investigate, and incorporate Geographical
SB77 Enrolled
113 Information Systems (GIS) mapping and other resources into the
114 report, and include recommended strategies for the efficient
115 and effective delivery of enhanced 911 service. In addition,
116 the board shall study the rates charged for 911 services and
117 make adjustments to the rates as provided in this chapter;
118 recommend any statutory changes necessary to ensure the most
119 efficient and effective delivery of 911 services in Alabama
120 over both the long-term and short-term; and provide a copy of
121 its 911 Annual Report to members of the boards of the
122 districts in the state through the Alabama Association of 911
123 Districts.
124 (2) To administer the 911 Fund and the monthly
125 statewide 911 charge authorized by Section 11-98-5.
126 (3) To distribute revenue in the 911 Fund in accordance
127 with this chapter.
128 (4) To establish policies and procedures, adopted in
129 accordance with the Alabama Administrative Procedure Act, to
130 fund advisory services, grants, and training for districts and
131 to provide funds in accordance with these policies and
132 procedures to the extent funds are available.
133 (5) To make and enter into contracts and agreements
134 necessary or incidental to the performance of its powers and
135 duties under this chapter and to use revenue available to the
136 911 Board under Section 11-98-5 for administrative expenses to
137 pay its obligations under the contracts and agreements.
138 (6) To accept gifts, grants, or other money for the 911
139 Fund.
140 (7) To undertake its duties in a manner that is
Page 5

(7) To undertake its duties in a manner that is
SB77 Enrolled
141 competitively and technologically neutral as to all voice
142 communications service providers.
143 (8) To administer the deployment and operation of a
144 statewide 911 voice and data system that utilizes emerging
145 communication technologies that are capable of connecting to a
146 911 system and delivering 911 and emergency information to
147 districts. The board shall use its available revenue to pay
148 obligations under the contracts and agreements for a statewide
149 911 voice and data system.
150 (9) To establish a certification program to train and
151 certify public safety telecommunicators employed by a primary
152 PSAP receiving 911 calls, including establishing minimum core
153 competency topics and minimum number of training hours,
154 deciding whether a written examination is required, and
155 establishing any necessary certification requirements, to the
156 extent funds are available to cover all costs for the training
157 established by the board. The board may establish rules for
158 enforcement of those PSAPs that fail to participate in the
159 certification program. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the
160 training and certification requirements of this section shall
161 not apply to any public safety telecommunicator employed by
162 the state or an agency or department thereof.
163 (10) To adopt rules in accordance with the
164 Administrative Procedure Act to implement this chapter; to
165 establish the statewide 911 charge; and, in response to
166 technological changes, apply, collect, and remit the statewide
167 911 charge, without duplication, to the active service
168 connections of other originating service providers that are
Page 6

connections of other originating service providers that are
SB77 Enrolled
169 technically capable of accessing a 911 system, subject to the
170 provisions applicable to voice communications service
171 providers under this chapter.
172 (11) To take other necessary and proper action to
173 implement this chapter."
174 Section 4. The Legislature concurs in the
175 recommendations of the Sunset Committee as provided in
176 Sections 1, 2, and 3.
177 Section 5. This act shall become effective June 1,
178 2026.
Page 7

2026.
SB77 Enrolled
179
180
181
182
183
184
185 ________________________________________________
186 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
187
188
189
190 ________________________________________________
191 Speaker of the House of Representatives
192
193
194 SB77
195 Senate 27-Jan-26
196 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
197 the Senate.
198
199 Patrick Harris,
200 Secretary.
201
202
203
204
205 House of Representatives
206 Passed: 19-Feb-26
207
208
209
210
211 By: Senator Carnley
Page 8